Utah statutes.
53B-25-202.   Permitted activities.

(1)  This chapter does not prohibit a postsecondary institution from requesting or requiring a student to disclose a username or password to gain access to or operate the following:

(a)  an electronic communications device supplied by or paid for in whole or in part by the postsecondary institution; or

(b)  an account or service provided by the postsecondary institution that is either obtained by virtue of the student's admission to the postsecondary institution or used by the student for educational purposes.

(2)  This chapter does not prohibit or restrict a postsecondary institution from viewing, accessing, or using information about a student or prospective student that can be obtained without the information described in Subsection 53B-25-201(1) or that is available in the public domain.



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

